Texas, session 891, HB233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: ARTICLE I SECTION 1.  (a) The members of the United States House of Representatives from the State of Texas are elected from the districts described by Article II of this Act. (b)  One member is elected from each district established by this Act. ARTICLE II SECTION 1.  The districts for members of the United States House of Representatives from the State of Texas are as described by PLANC2305 on the redistricting computer system operated by the Texas Legislative Council. ARTICLE III SECTION 1.  In this Act, "tract," "block group," and "block" mean the geographic areas identified by those terms on the 2020 Census TIGER/Line Shapefiles, prepared by the federal Bureau of the Census for the Twenty-fourth Decennial Census of the United States, enumerated as of April 1, 2020. SECTION 2.  It is the intention of the Texas Legislature that, if any county, tract, block group, block, or other geographic area has erroneously been left out of this Act, a court reviewing this Act should include that area in the appropriate district in accordance with the intent of the legislature, using any available evidence of that intent, including evidence such as that used by the Supreme Court of Texas in Smith v. Patterson, 111 Tex. 535, 242 S.W. 749 (1922). SECTION 3.  (a) This Act supersedes all previous enactments or orders adopting congressional districts for the State of Texas. All previous acts of the legislature adopting congressional districts for the State of Texas are repealed. (b)  Chapter 7 (S.B. 6), Acts of the 87th Legislature, 3rd Called Session, 2021, is repealed. SECTION 4.  The districts described by Article II of this Act apply to the election of the members of the United States House of Representatives from the State of Texas beginning with the primary and general elections in 2026 for members of the 120th Congress. This Act does not affect the membership or congressional districts of the 119th Congress. SECTION 5.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.